District of Columbia statutes.
3-2503

Repealed

Licenses — Application.

Repealed.

June 18, 1898, 30 Stat. 477, ch. 467, § 3
July 14, 1932, 47 Stat. 659, ch. 476, § 3
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 3(g), 23 DCR 1178
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1237, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-2103.
1973 Ed., § 2-1403.